District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Full Accountability in Arrest Reporting Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Arrest report and probable cause affidavit transparency requirements.
(a) Following an arrest, a member of the Metropolitan Police Department shall include the
following information, to the extent known at the time, in documentation supporting the arrest,
including a probable cause affidavit:
(1) The name, badge number or other identifying number, and employing agency
of each law enforcement officer present at the scene;
(2) Whether any law enforcement officer present at the scene used force during the
arrest, and if so, a description of the force used; and
(3) The number of unidentified law enforcement officers at the scene and whether
any law enforcement officer declined to disclose their identity.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose any legal obligation on any law
enforcement officer other than a member of the Metropolitan Police Department.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the term:
(1) “Law enforcement officer” means any sworn member of the Metropolitan
Police Department or any law enforcement officer, including federal officers, acting .
(2) “Probable cause affidavit” means any affidavit prepared by a member of the
Metropolitan Police Department to establish probable cause following a warrantless arrest.
Sec. 3. Section 3004 of the Body-Worn Camera Regulation and Reporting Requirements
Act of 2015, effective October 22, 2015 (D.C. Law 21-36; D.C. Official Code 5-116.33); is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (c) is amended by adding a new paragraph (2A) to read as follows:

“(2A)(A) Within 5 business days after an incident in which a federal law
enforcement officer commits a serious use of force against an individual in the presence of one
or more members of the Metropolitan Police Department, and the incident is captured in whole
or in part on a body-worn camera recording made by a member of the Metropolitan Police
Department, the Mayor shall publicly release:
“(i) The body-worn camera recordings of all Metropolitan Police
Department members whose cameras recorded any portion of the incident; and
“(ii) A description of the incident.
“(B) A release made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall
be subject to the consent provisions in paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(b) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is re-designated as paragraph (1A).
(2) A new paragraph (1) is added to read as follows:
“(1) “Federal law enforcement officer” means an officer, agent, or employee of the
United States, or of any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States, who is
empowered by law to make arrests, conduct investigations, or carry firearms in the performance
of law enforcement duties.”.
(3) Paragraph (3) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (E) to read as follows:
“(E) Conduct covered by subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph
when carried out by a federal law enforcement officer and, in the case of subparagraph (D) of this
paragraph, conduct occasioned by a canine under the control of a federal law enforcement officer.”.

Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.

The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813, D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
100 Columbia Register.